Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.230

Petitions—Verification and canvass of signatures, observers—Statistical sampling—Initiatives to legislature, certification of.

Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the legal voters on the petition. The verification and canvass of signatures on the petition may be observed by persons representing the advocates and opponents of the proposed measure so long as they make no record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions or related records during the verification process except upon the order of the superior court of Thurston county. The secretary of state may limit the number of observers to not less than two on each side, if in his or her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of the verification process. Any such limitation shall apply equally to both sides. The secretary of state may use any statistical sampling techniques for this verification and canvass which have been adopted by rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No petition will be rejected on the basis of any statistical method employed, and no petition will be accepted on the basis of any statistical method employed if such method indicates that the petition contains fewer than the requisite number of signatures of legal voters. If the secretary of state finds the same name signed to more than one petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid signature. For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of state shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the petition.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1823. Prior: 1993 c 368 s 1; 1982 c 116 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 105; 1969 ex.s. c 107 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.200; prior: 1933 c 144 s 1; 1913 c 138 s 15; RRS s 5411. Formerly RCW 29.79.200.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 368: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 368 s 2.]

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.